Nebraska, session 109, LB174.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB174 LB174
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-1558, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1558 (1) Except as provided in subsections subsection (2) and (3)
of this section, the maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of
an individual for any workweek which is subject to garnishment shall not
exceed the lesser of the following amounts:
(a) Twenty-five percent of his or her disposable earnings for that
week;
(b) The amount by which his or her disposable earnings for that week
exceed thirty times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by 29
U.S.C. 206(a)(1) in effect at the time earnings are payable; or
(c) Fifteen percent of his or her disposable earnings for that week,
if the individual is a head of a family.
(2) The restrictions of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply in the case of:
(a) Any order of any court for the support of any persons;
(b) Any order of any court of bankruptcy under Chapter XIII of the
Bankruptcy Act; or
(c) Any debt due for any state or federal tax.
(3) The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an
individual for any workweek which is subject to garnishment for medical
debt sought by medical debt buyers or medical creditors shall not exceed
the lesser of the following amounts:
(a) Ten percent of his or her disposable earnings for that week;
(b) The amount by which his or her disposable earnings for that week
exceed thirty times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by 29
U.S.C. 206(a)(1) in effect at the time earnings are payable; or
(c) Twenty percent of his or her disposable earnings for that week,
if the individual is not a head of a family, as established by specific
factual allegations from the judgment creditor in a sworn affidavit.
(4) (3) No court shall make, execute, or enforce any order or
-2-

LB174 LB174
2025 2025
process in violation of this section. The exemptions allowed in this
section shall be granted to any person so entitled without any further
proceedings.
(5) (4) For the purposes of this section:
(a) Earnings shall mean compensation paid or payable by an employer
to an employee for personal services, whether denominated as wages,
salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments
pursuant to a pension or retirement program;
(b) Disposable earnings shall mean that part of the earnings of any
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amounts required by law to be withheld;
(c) Garnishment shall mean any legal or equitable procedure through
which the earnings of any individual are required to be withheld for
payment of any debt; and
(d) Head of a family shall mean an individual who actually supports
and maintains one or more individuals who are closely connected with him
or her by blood relationship, relationship by marriage, by adoption, or
by guardianship, and whose right to exercise family control and provide
for the dependent individuals is based upon some moral or legal
obligation; and .
(e) Health care services means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical, dental, behavioral,
or mental health condition, illness, injury, or disease, including a
substance use disorder. Such services include, but are not limited to,
any procedures, products, devices, or medications;
(f) Medical debt means a debt arising from the receipt of health
care services;
(g) Medical debt buyer means a person or entity that is engaged in
the business of purchasing medical debts for collection purposes, whether
it collects the debt itself or hires a third party for collection or an
attorney for litigation in order to collect such debt; and
-3-

LB174 LB174
2025 2025
(h) Medical creditor means any entity that provides health care
services and to whom the individual owes money for health care services,
or the entity that provided health care services and to whom the
individual previously owed money if the medical debt has been purchased
by one or more medical debt buyers.
(6) (5) Every assignment, sale, transfer, pledge, or mortgage of the
wages or salary of an individual which is exempted by this section, to
the extent of the exemption provided by this section, shall be void and
unenforceable by any process of law.
(7) (6) No employer shall discharge any employee by reason of the
fact that his or her earnings have been subjected to garnishment for any
one indebtedness.
(8) (7) In the case of earnings for any pay period other than a
week, the Commissioner of Labor shall by regulation prescribe a multiple
of the federal minimum hourly wage equivalent in effect to that set forth
in this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 25-1558, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-